Arkansas, session 2025, HB1653.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-8-107(c) and (d), concerning the
expansion of facilities or services permitted by Health Services Permit
Agency, are amended to read as follows:
(c) In no event shall the requirements of this subchapter apply to any
facility licensed or approved as of March 1, 2003, by the Child Welfare
Agency Review Board pursuant to the Child Welfare Agency Licensing Act, § 9-
28-401 et seq., and as specifically exempted by § 9-28-407(a)(3).
(d) Beginning July 1, 2005, the Health Services Permit Agency may not
accept applications or requests for permits of approval to add new beds or to
expand existing bed capacity of residential care facilities.
(d)(1) The Health Services Permit Agency shall recognize an exception
*JMB064*
03-31-2025 13:35:19 JMB064

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 H3/31/25 HB1653
to the moratorium regarding bed capacity and beds in a psychiatric
residential treatment facility.
(2) The Health Services Permit Agency shall add to the permitted
bed capacity for psychiatric residential treatment facilities:
(A) Beds that are not currently permitted by the Health
Services Permit Agency but are licensed by the Child Welfare Agency Review
Board for the purpose of operating as a psychiatric residential treatment
facility before the effective date of this subsection; and
(B) Beds that are fully constructed and could be used for
the purpose of operating a psychiatric residential treatment facility as of
January 1, 2025.
(3) The total amount of additional beds authorized under this
subsection shall not exceed nine hundred (900) beds for the purpose of
operating as a psychiatric residential treatment facility.
(4) The Health Services Permit Agency shall require prior
approval under § 20-8-109 for any new construction of a psychiatric
residential treatment facility and for any renovation project that exceeds
two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) for an existing psychiatric
residential treatment facility.
(5) Any increase or decrease in the total number of authorized
beds under this section shall be reviewed and approved by the Legislative
Council before receiving a permit from the Health Services Permit Agency or a
license from the Office of Long-Term Care.
(6) For the purposes of this section, beds used for both in-
state and out-of-state clients shall be counted in capacity for the purpose
of obtaining a permit from the Health Services Permit Agency.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 20-10-101(1), concerning the definition of
"administrative remedy" relating to long-term care facilities and services,
is amended to read as follows:
(1) “Administrative remedy” means temporary management, denial
of payment for all new admissions, transfer of residents, termination or
suspension of license, termination of provider agreement, directed plan of
correction, directed in-service training, and remedies established by
Arkansas law, including remedies provided in § 20-10-1408 [repealed];

03-31-2025 13:35:19 JMB064

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 H3/31/25 HB1653
SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 20-10-101(9)(A), concerning the definition
of "long-term care facility" relating to long-term care facilities and
services, is amended to read as follows:
(9)(A) “Long-term care facility” means a nursing home,
residential care facility, assisted living facility, psychiatric residential
treatment facility, post-acute head injury retraining and residential care
facility, or any other facility which provides long-term medical or personal
care.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 20-10-101, concerning definitions relating
to long-term care facilities and services, is amended to add an additional
subdivision to read as follows:
(16)(A) "Psychiatric residential treatment facility" means a
standalone, nonhospital facility with a provider agreement with the Arkansas
Medicaid Program to provide inpatient services benefits to individuals who
are under twenty-one (21) years of age and that:
(i) Is accredited by The Joint Commission or any
other accrediting organization with comparable standards recognized by this
state;
(ii) Attests to meeting the conditions of
participation found at 42 C.F.R. Part 483, Subpart G, as existing on January
1, 2025; and
(iii) Attests that all of the residents in the
facility meet the certification of need for services requirements as
identified under 42 C.F.R. Part 441, Subpart D, as existing on January 1,
2025.
(B)(i) A survey and certification review of a psychiatric
residential treatment facility by the department shall apply to all residents
being served by the entity regardless of residency or payment source.
(ii) All residents of a psychiatric residential
treatment facility shall require intensive inpatient services for psychiatric
conditions under the direction of a physician and the services provided shall
be reasonably expected to improve the resident’s condition or prevent further
regression until the services are no longer needed.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 20-10-110(a)(2), concerning the definition
03-31-2025 13:35:19 JMB064

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 H3/31/25 HB1653
of "long-term care facility" relating to the protection of residents'
personal funds, is amended to read as follows:
(2) “Long-term care facility” means a nursing home, residential
care facility, post-acute head injury retraining and residential care
facility, assisted living facility, psychiatric residential treatment
facility, or any other facility that provides long-term medical or personal
care;

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 20-10-402 is amended to read as follows:
20-10-402. License required.
(a) It shall be unlawful for any person to act or serve in the
capacity of nursing home long-term care facility administrator in this state
unless the person has been licensed to do so as authorized in this
subchapter.
(b) A person who serves as an administrator of a long-term care
facility conducted exclusively for persons who rely upon treatment by
spiritual means through prayer in accordance with the creed or tenets of a
church or religious denomination shall be exempt from subsection (a) of this
section and § 20-10-101(1)-(6), § 20-10-203(b), § 20-10-212, §§ 20-10-301 —
20-10-303 [repealed], § 20-10-403, § 20-10-405(b) § 20-10-405(a)(2), § 20-10-
406, and § 20-10-407.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 20-10-404(a), concerning the application
and fees for licensure as a long-term care facility administrator, is amended
to read as follows:
(a) Any person desiring to be licensed as a nursing home long-term
care facility administrator shall make application to the Office of Long-Term
Care on forms prescribed by the office and shall furnish such information
with the application as shall be required by the office.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 20-10-405 is amended to read as follows:
20-10-405. Renewal.
(a)(1) Every active nursing home administrator's license shall be
renewed on or before July 1 of each year by paying a fee of one hundred
dollars ($100) to the Office of Long-Term Care and by furnishing written
documentation that the licensee has attended and accumulated a specific
03-31-2025 13:35:19 JMB064

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 H3/31/25 HB1653
number of continuing education clock hours as established by the office.
(b)(2) The fee for those nursing home administrators not actively
employed by a nursing home facility as an administrator shall be fifty
dollars ($50.00), payable on or before July 1 of each year.
(c)(3) If the annual licensure fee in full along with the renewal
application and satisfactory documentation of compliance with continuing
education requirements is not postmarked or received by the office on or
before July 1, the licensee shall be ineligible to perform the duties of
nursing home administrator, and the license shall be deemed suspended
effective July 2.
(d)(4) No request for renewal postmarked or received by the office
after July 1 shall be considered unless, in addition to other requirements
imposed by law or rule, the licensee tenders a late charge in the amount of
fifty dollars ($50.00).
(e)(5) Any nursing home administrator license not renewed on or before
September 1 shall expire effective September 2.
(b) An administrator for a long-term care facility other than a
nursing home shall be required to renew his or her license as follows:
(1) Every active administrator license shall be renewed on or
before January 1 of each year by submitting a renewal application to the
Department of Human Services and by furnishing written documentation that the
licensee has attended and accumulated a specific number of continuing
education clock hours as established by the department;
(2) If the renewal application and satisfactory documentation of
compliance with continuing education requirements is not postmarked or
received by the department on or before January 1, the licensee shall be
ineligible to perform the duties of long-term care facility administrator,
and the license shall be deemed suspended effective January 2;
(3) A request for renewal postmarked or received by the
department after January 1 shall not be considered unless the licensee
complies with all of the requirements imposed by law or rule; and
(4) Any long-term care facility administrator license not
renewed on or before March 1 shall expire effective March 2.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 20-10-407(a), concerning the denial,
revocation, or suspension of a long-term care facility administrator's
03-31-2025 13:35:19 JMB064

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 H3/31/25 HB1653
license, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The Department of Human Services may refuse to issue or renew a
long-term care facility administrator's license or may revoke or suspend the
license of a long-term care facility administrator if the department finds
that the applicant or licensee does not qualify for licensure or has violated
§ 20-10-101(1)-(6), § 20-10-203(b), § 20-10-212, §§ 20-10-402 and 20-10-403,
§ 20-10-405(b) § 20-10-405(a)(2), § 20-10-406, and this section or rules of
the department relating to the proper administration and management of a
long-term care facility.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 46, Subchapter 4 is
amended to read as follows:
Subchapter 4 — Psychiatric Residential Treatment Facilities

20-46-401 - 20-46-404. [Repealed.]

20-46-401. Admission of children to psychiatric residential treatment
facilities.
(a) A psychiatric residential treatment facility licensed under this
subchapter and holding a permit from the Health Services Permit Agency or the
Health Services Permit Commission shall not admit a child for psychiatric
residential treatment unless the child is:
(1) An Arkansas resident;
(2) A child of a parent who is an Arkansas resident;
(3) A child placed by or on behalf of another state’s child
welfare agency;
(4) A child for whom the facility is being paid by another
state's Medicaid program;
(5) A child of an active-duty member or veteran of the uniformed
services as defined in § 6-4-302; or
(6) A nonresident child victim of human trafficking when the
regulated facility maintains responsibility for the return of the child to an
out-of-state custodian.
(b) The Department of Human Services may promulgate rules to enforce
this section.

03-31-2025 13:35:19 JMB064

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 H3/31/25 HB1653

20-46-402. Licensure — Unlawful acts.
(a)(1) It is unlawful for any person, partnership, group, corporation,
association, or other entity or identifiable group of entities having a
coordinated ownership with controlling interest to operate or assist in the
operation of a psychiatric residential treatment facility that has not been
licensed by the Office of Long-Term Care under this subchapter.
(2) Before obtaining a license under this subchapter, a
psychiatric residential treatment facility shall obtain a permit from the
Health Services Permit Agency or Health Services Permit Commission to operate
in Arkansas.
(3) The bed capacity allowed by the permit issued by the Health
Services Permit Agency or Health Services Permit Commission includes both in-
state and out-of-state clients.
(4) Any expansion of bed capacity by an existing licensee shall
require a license from the office and a permit from the Health Services
Permit Agency.
(5)(A) A license issued by the office under this subchapter is
effective unless revoked, suspended, or terminated by the office.
(B) In addition to any other basis provided by law or
rule, the Department of Human Services shall terminate the license of a
psychiatric residential treatment facility licensee that has not been in
operation for a consecutive twelve-month period.
(C) The department may revoke, suspend, or terminate a
license upon any basis provided by law or rule, including without limitation
the failure to be in operation or in substantial compliance for a consecutive
six-month period.
(b) It is unlawful for any person to falsify an application for
licensure, to knowingly circumvent the authority of this subchapter, to
knowingly violate the orders issued by the department, or to advertise for
inpatient psychiatric residential treatment when not licensed under this
subchapter to provide those services.
(c) Any violation of this section shall constitute a Class D felony.

20-46-403. Licensure posting and display.
If the Department of Human Services issues a license to operate a
03-31-2025 13:35:19 JMB064

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 H3/31/25 HB1653
psychiatric residential treatment facility, the license shall be posted and
displayed in a conspicuous place in the facility and must state at a minimum:
(1) The full legal name of the person, partnership, group,
corporation, organization, association, or other entity or identifiable group
of entities having a coordinated ownership with controlling interest holding
the license, including the business name, if different;
(2) The address of the psychiatric residential treatment
facility;
(3) The effective date and expiration date of the license, if
applicable;
(4) The type of psychiatric residential treatment facility the
licensee is authorized to operate;
(5) The ages and maximum number of children that may receive
services from the psychiatric residential treatment facility;
(6) The status of the license, whether regular, provisional, or
probationary; and
(7) Any special conditions or limitations of the license.

20-46-404. Services provided by psychiatric residential treatment
facilities.
(a) A psychiatric residential treatment facility licensed under this
subchapter shall:
(1)(A) Provide a range of comprehensive services to treat the
psychiatric condition of residents on an inpatient basis under the direction
of a physician.
(B) The psychiatric residential treatment facility shall
certify that:
(i) Ambulatory care services available in the
community do not meet the treatment needs of the resident;
(ii) Proper treatment of the resident's psychiatric
condition requires services on an inpatient basis under the direction of a
physician; and
(iii) The services can reasonably be expected to
improve the resident’s condition or prevent further regression so that the
services will no longer be needed.
(C) The certification required in subdivision (a)(1)(B) of
03-31-2025 13:35:19 JMB064

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 H3/31/25 HB1653
this section shall be made by an independent team that:
(i) Includes a physician;
(ii) Has competence in diagnosis and treatment of
mental illness, preferably in child psychiatry; and
(iii) Has knowledge of the resident's situation; and
(2) Provide services to a resident according to an individual
plan of care that:
(A) Is based on a diagnostic evaluation that includes
examination of the medical, psychological, social, behavioral, and
developmental aspects of the resident's situation and reflects the need for
inpatient psychiatric care;
(B) Is developed by a team of professionals in
consultation with the resident, parents, legal guardians, or other
individuals in whose care the resident will be released after discharge;
(C) Describes clear and concise treatment objectives;
(D) Ensures continuity of care with the resident’s family,
school and educational requirements, and community upon discharge;
(E) Determines that services being provided are or were
required on an inpatient basis; and
(F) Recommends changes in the plan of care as indicated by
the resident's overall adjustment as an inpatient.
(b) The Department of Human Services shall promulgate rules to
implement this subchapter, which shall include components that ensure quality
of care, health and safety of residents and facility staff, and compliance
with all educational requirements.


SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 9-28-402(8), concerning the definition of
"child welfare agency" within the Child Welfare Agency Licensing Act, is
amended to read as follows:
(8) “Child welfare agency” means any person, corporation,
partnership, voluntary association, or other entity or identifiable group of
entities having a coordinated ownership of controlling interest, whether
established for profit or otherwise, that is not excluded under this
subchapter and engages in any of the following activities:
(A) Receives a total number of six (6) or more unrelated
03-31-2025 13:35:19 JMB064

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 H3/31/25 HB1653
minors for care on a twenty-four-hour basis for the purpose of ensuring the
minors receive care, training, education, custody, or supervision, whether or
not there are six (6) or more children cared for at any single physical
location;
(B) Places any unrelated minor for care on a twenty-four-
hour basis with persons other than themselves;
(C) Plans for or assists in the placements described in
subdivision (8)(B) of this section; or
(D) Receives, places, plans, or assists in the placement
of a child victim of human trafficking in a home or any type of shelter or
facility;

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 9-28-402(12), concerning the definition of
"exempt child welfare agency" within the Child Welfare Agency Licensing Act,
is amended to read as follows:
(12) “Exempt child welfare agency” means any person,
corporation, partnership, voluntary association or other entity, whether
established for profit or otherwise, that otherwise fits the definition of a
child welfare agency but that is specifically exempt from the requirement of
obtaining a license under this subchapter. Those agencies specifically exempt
from the license requirement are:
(A) A facility or program owned or operated by an agency
of the United States Government;
(B)(i) Any agency of the State of Arkansas that is
statutorily authorized to administer or supervise child welfare activities.
(ii) In order to maintain exempt status, the state
child welfare agency shall state every two (2) years in written form signed
by the persons in charge that their agency is in substantial compliance with
published state agency child welfare standards.
(iii) Visits to review and advise exempt state
agencies shall be made as deemed necessary by the Child Welfare Agency Review
Board to verify and maintain substantial compliance with the standards;
(C) A facility or program owned or operated by or under
contract with the Division of Correction;
(D) A hospital providing acute care licensed pursuant to §
20-9-201 et seq.;
03-31-2025 13:35:19 JMB064

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 H3/31/25 HB1653
(E)(D) Any facility governed by the Department of Human
Services State Institutional System Board or its successor;
(F) Human development centers regulated by the Board of
Developmental Disabilities Services pursuant to the Location Act for
Community Homes for Individuals with Intellectual and Developmental
Disabilities, § 20-48-601 et seq.;
(G) Any facility licensed as a family home pursuant to the
Location Act for Community Homes for Individuals with Intellectual and
Developmental Disabilities, § 20-48-601 et seq.;
(H)(E) Any boarding school as defined in this section;
(I)(F) Any temporary camp as defined in this section;
(J)(G) Any state-operated facility to house juvenile
delinquents or any serious offender program facility operated by a state
designee to house juvenile delinquents. Those facilities shall be subject to
program requirements modeled on nationally recognized correctional facility
standards that shall be developed, administered, and monitored by the
Division of Youth Services; and
(K)(H) Any child welfare agency operated solely by a
religious organization that elects to be exempt from licensing and that
complies within the conditions of the exemption for church-operated agencies
as set forth in this subchapter;
(L) The Division of Developmental Disabilities Services;
and
(M) Any intellectual or other developmental disabilities
services waiver provider licensed under § 20-48-208 or the Location Act for
Community Homes for Individuals with Intellectual and Developmental
Disabilities, § 20-48-601 et seq.;

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 9-28-402(18) is repealed.
(18) “Psychiatric residential treatment facility” means a
residential childcare facility in a nonhospital setting that provides a
structured, systematic, therapeutic program of treatment under the
supervision of a psychiatrist, for children who are emotionally disturbed and
in need of daily nursing services, psychiatrist's supervision, and
residential care but who are not in an acute phase of illness requiring the
services of an inpatient psychiatric hospital;
03-31-2025 13:35:19 JMB064

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 H3/31/25 HB1653

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 9-28-402(22), concerning the definition of
"residential childcare facility" within the Child Welfare Agency Licensing
Act, is amended to read as follows:
(22)(A) “Residential childcare facility” means any child welfare
agency that is not an excluded child welfare agency under this subchapter and
provides care, training, education, custody, or supervision on a twenty-four-
hour basis for six (6) or more unrelated children, excluding foster homes
that have six (6) or more children who are all related to each other but who
are not related to the foster parents.
(B) A "residential childcare facility" does not include a
facility that provides inpatient psychiatric treatment, which shall not be
licensed as a residential childcare facility;

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code § 9-28-402, concerning the definitions
within the Child Welfare Agency Licensing Act, is amended to add an
additional subdivision to read as follows:
(32) "Excluded child welfare agency" means any person,
corporation, partnership, voluntary association, or other entity, whether
established for-profit or otherwise, that meets the definition of a child
welfare agency or an exempt child welfare agency but is licensed or certified
by the Department of Human Services or the Department of Health and is
enrolled in the Arkansas Medicaid Program.

SECTION 16. Arkansas Code § 9-28-403(a), concerning the creation and
authority of the Child Welfare Agency Review Board, is amended to read as
follows:
(a)(1) There is created the Child Welfare Agency Review Board to serve
as the administrative body to carry out the provisions of this subchapter.
(2) The board shall have the authority to promulgate rules to
enforce the provisions of this subchapter.
(3) An excluded child welfare agency is not subject to the
provisions of this subchapter.

SECTION 17. Arkansas Code § 9-28-404(a)(5), concerning the membership
of the Child Welfare Agency Review Board, is repealed.
03-31-2025 13:35:19 JMB064

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 H3/31/25 HB1653
(5) One (1) representative from a licensed psychiatric
residential treatment facility;

SECTION 18. Arkansas Code § 9-28-407(a)(3) and (4), concerning
licenses required and issued by the Child Welfare Agency Review Board, are
repealed.
(3) Any child welfare agency capacity licensed by the board as
of March 1, 2003, whether held by the original licensee or by a successor in
interest to the original licensee, is exempted from:
(A) Obtaining any license or permit from the Office of
Long-Term Care; and
(B)(i) Obtaining any permit from the Health Services
Permit Agency or the Health Services Permit Commission to operate at the
capacity licensed by the board as of March 1, 2003, except as required under
subdivision (a)(3)(B)(ii) of this section.
(ii)(a) If a licensee is operating at less than or
at the capacity licensed by the board as of March 1, 2021, the licensee shall
obtain a permit from the Health Services Permit Agency or the Health Services
Permit Commission for any increase in capacity.
(b) For the purposes of subdivision
(a)(3)(B)(ii)(a) of this section, both in-state and out-of-state clients
shall be counted in capacity for the purpose of obtaining a license from the
board and a permit from the Health Services Permit Agency or the Health
Services Permit Commission.
(4) Any new license or expansion of capacity by an
existing licensee of the board shall require a license and permit from the
Office of Long-Term Care or the Health Services Permit Agency.

SECTION 19. Arkansas Code § 9-28-407(a)(5), concerning licenses
required and issued by the Child Welfare Agency Review Board, is amended to
read as follows:
(5)(A) A license issued by the board under this subchapter is
effective unless revoked, suspended, or terminated by the board.
(B) In addition to any other basis provided by law or
rule, the board shall terminate the license of a psychiatric residential
treatment facility licensee that has not been in operation for a consecutive
03-31-2025 13:35:19 JMB064

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 H3/31/25 HB1653
twelve-month period.
(C) The Department of Human Services may recommend to the
board the revocation, suspension, or termination of a license for any basis
provided by law or rule, including without limitation the failure to be in
operation or in substantial compliance for a consecutive six-month period.

SECTION 20. Arkansas Code § 9-28-407(f)(3)(F), concerning licenses
required and issued by the Child Welfare Agency Review Board, is amended to
read as follows:
(F) The provisions of subsection (a) of this section,
including those provisions regarding obtaining licenses or permits from the
Office of Long-Term Care and regarding obtaining any permits from the Health
Services Permit Agency or the Health Services Permit Commission, shall apply
in their entirety to the new owner of the child welfare agency

SECTION 21. Arkansas Code § 9-28-416 is repealed.
9-28-416. Admission of children to psychiatric residential treatment
facilities.
(a) A psychiatric residential treatment facility licensed under this
subchapter and holding a permit from the Health Services Permit Agency or the
Health Services Permit Commission shall not admit a child for psychiatric
residential treatment unless the child is:
(1) An Arkansas resident;
(2) A child of a parent who is an Arkansas resident;
(3) A child placed by or on behalf of another state's child
welfare agency;
(4) A child for whom the facility is being paid by another
state's Medicaid program;
(5) A child of an active-duty member or veteran of the uniformed
services as defined in § 6-4-302; or
(6) A nonresident child victim of human trafficking when the
regulated facility maintains responsibility for the return of the child to
the out-of-state custodian.
(b) The Department of Human Services may promulgate rules to enforce
this section.

03-31-2025 13:35:19 JMB064

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 H3/31/25 HB1653
SECTION 22. Arkansas Code Title 9, Chapter 28, Subchapter 13, is
repealed.
Subchapter 13 — Psychiatric Residential Treatment Facilities and Other
Regulated Facilities

9-28-1301. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Psychiatric residential treatment facility” means the same
as defined in § 9-28-402; and
(2) “Regulated facility” means:
(A) A psychiatric residential treatment facility licensed
under the Child Welfare Agency Licensing Act, § 9-28-401 et seq.; and
(B) A psychiatric hospital licensed under § 20-9-201 et
seq., that admits a child for the purpose of providing behavioral health
treatment, regardless of whether the child is placed in an acute, subacute,
or otherwise unlicensed bed.

9-28-1302. Quality of care — Quality assurance reviews.
(a) The Department of Human Services shall promulgate rules setting
minimum standards and metrics governing the quality of care provided by a
regulated facility to a child.
(b) Quality of care standards shall include that a regulated facility
shall provide:
(1) Trauma-informed programming and clinical services and, when
applicable, evidence-based treatments;
(2) Services that will be short-term, target treatment episodes
to reduce the likelihood of re-entry into residential treatment settings;
(3) Services that are family-driven and youth-guided;
(4) Mental health services and clinical services provided by
clinical staff as appropriate for the child's needs;
(5) Educational services in compliance with state and federal
law and rules of the Department of Education;
(6) Coordination of all needs including medical, dental, and
other needs; and
(7) Clinical discharge planning throughout the child's stay that
includes the custodian and child involvement.
03-31-2025 13:35:19 JMB064

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 H3/31/25 HB1653
(c)(1) The Department of Human Services and its designees may inspect
and investigate the quality of care for behavioral health provided to any
child admitted to a regulated facility, whether or not the child is an
Arkansas resident.
(2) The Department of Human Services or any other public agency
having authority or responsibility with respect to child maltreatment,
including without limitation the Medicaid Fraud Control Unit of the Attorney
General's office, may investigate any alleged or suspected child maltreatment
in any regulated facility.
(d) The Department of Human Services shall conduct quality assurance
reviews for each regulated facility, consisting of the following:
(1) A review of treatment structure including without
limitation:
(A) Observation of paraprofessional and direct-care staff
interaction with patients;
(B) Review of daily activity structure outside of school
and treatment;
(C) Review of paraprofessional and direct-care staff
training and personnel records;
(D) Review of staff-to-client ratios; and
(E) Completion of client interviews;
(2) An analysis of referral data, statistics, and psychotropic
medication prescriptions;
(3) An on-site visit of a regulated facility's operation, to be
conducted at least once per year; and
(4) Technical assistance and ongoing quality assurance and
collaboration as needed.
(e) This subchapter does not require any additional licensure or
certification for a regulated facility.

9-28-1303. Department enforcement authority.
(a) The Department of Human Services may initiate an adverse action
against a regulated facility that:
(1) Fails to comply with the provisions of this subchapter or
any rule of the department relating to quality of care;
(2) Furnishes or makes any statement or report to the department
03-31-2025 13:35:19 JMB064

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 H3/31/25 HB1653
that is false or misleading;
(3) Refuses or fails to submit required reports or to make
available to the department any records required by the department in making
an investigation of the agency for quality of care purposes;
(4) Refuses or fails to submit to an investigation or to
reasonable inspection by the department;
(5) Retaliates against an employee who in good faith reports a
suspected violation of the provisions of this subchapter or the rules
promulgated under this subchapter;
(6) Fails to engage in a course of professional conduct in
dealing with clients being served by the regulated facility, as defined by
rules promulgated under this subchapter; or
(7) Demonstrates gross negligence in carrying out the duties at
the regulated facility.
(b) The department may impose an adverse action as follows:
(1) Issue letters of reprimand or caution;
(2) Require a corrective action plan; and
(3)(A) Impose civil penalties of up to two thousand five hundred
dollars ($2,500) per violation, with each day of noncompliance and each
client injured as a result of noncompliance constituting a separate
violation.
(B) If any person upon whom the department has levied a
civil penalty fails to pay the civil penalty within sixty (60) days of the
decision of the department to impose the penalty, the amount of the fine
shall be considered to be a debt owed to the State of Arkansas and may be
collected by civil action.
(C) Civil penalties collected under this section may be
expended only for the purpose of providing technical assistance and training
to regulated facilities.
(c)(1) For a regulated facility licensed under the Child Welfare
Agency Licensing Act, § 9-28-401 et seq., the department may petition the
Child Welfare Agency Review Board to deny, suspend, or revoke the regulated
facility's license on the basis of any adverse action imposed by the
department under this section.
(2) For a regulated facility licensed under § 20-9-201 et seq.,
the department may petition the State Board of Health to deny, suspend, or
03-31-2025 13:35:19 JMB064

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 H3/31/25 HB1653
revoke the regulated facility's license on the basis of any adverse action
imposed by the department under this section.
(d) The department shall notify the regulated facility of the adverse
action of the department in writing and set forth the facts forming the basis
for the adverse action.
(e)(1) Adverse action hearings shall comply with the Arkansas
Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.
(2) Within ten (10) business days after rendering a decision,
the department shall forward to the regulated facility written findings of
fact and conclusions of law articulating the decision of the department.

9-28-1304. Rules.
The Department of Human Services shall promulgate rules to implement
this subchapter.

SECTION 23. DO NOT CODIFY. TEMPORARY LANGUAGE. Rules.
(a) Beds within a psychiatric residential treatment facility, whether
licensed on the effective date of this act or otherwise, shall not be
approved and licensed under the new regulatory structure established in this
act until:
(1) The Office of Long-Term Care promulgates a certification
manual; and
(2) The Arkansas Medicaid Program promulgates a provider manual
for psychiatric residential treatment facility services.
(b) Providers of psychiatric residential treatment facility services
in this state shall have one (1) year from the effective date of this act to
develop, implement, and operate services that establish the appropriate
continuum of care for families as defined by the Department of Human
Services.

SECTION 24. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that beds in psychiatric
residential treatment facilities have been permitted but are not currently
licensed; that these beds in psychiatric residential treatment facilities
that are not licensed cannot be used for children in need of healthcare
services despite the demand for the beds; that this act would authorize
03-31-2025 13:35:19 JMB064

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 H3/31/25 HB1653
licensing of the beds in psychiatric residential treatment facilities and
therefore allow the use of these beds in psychiatric residential treatment
facilities for children in need; and that this act is immediately necessary
to provide healthcare services to children in need across this state who are
currently not able to be admitted into a psychiatric residential treatment
facility. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being
immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and
safety shall become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

/s/Cavenaugh




















03-31-2025 13:35:19 JMB064